Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Officer Certification and Training

15.380.
Officers required to be certified — Officers permitted to be certified — Exemptions.

The following officers employed or appointed as full-time, part-time, or auxiliary officers, whether paid or unpaid, shall be certified:

Department of Kentucky State Police officers, but for the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

City, county, and urban-county police officers;

Court security officers and deputy sheriffs, except those identified in KRS

70.045

and 70.263(3);

State or public university police officers appointed pursuant to KRS

164.950

;

School resource officers as defined in KRS

158.441

and employed or appointed under KRS

158.4414

;

Airport safety and security officers appointed under KRS

183.880

;

Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control investigators appointed under KRS

241.090

;

Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation investigators appointed under KRS

304.47-040

;

Fire investigators appointed or employed under KRS

95A.100

or

227.220

; and

County detectives appointed in accordance with KRS

69.360

after July 1, 2019.

The requirements of KRS

15.380

to

15.404

for certification may apply to all state peace officers employed pursuant to KRS Chapter 18A and shall, if adopted, be incorporated by the Personnel Cabinet for job specifications.

Additional training in excess of the standards set forth in KRS

15.380

to

15.404

for all peace officers possessing arrest powers who have specialized law enforcement responsibilities shall be the responsibility of the employing agency.

The following officers may, upon request of the employing agency, be certified by the council:

Deputy coroners;

Deputy constables;

Deputy jailers;

Deputy sheriffs under KRS

70.045

and 70.263(3);

Officers appointed under KRS

61.360

;

Officers appointed under KRS

61.902

, except those who are school resource officers as defined in KRS

158.441

and who shall be certified under subsection (1)(e) of this section;

Private security officers;

Employees of a correctional services division created pursuant to KRS

67A.028

and employees of a metropolitan correctional services department created pursuant to KRS

67B.010

to

67B.080

; and

Investigators employed by the Department of Charitable Gaming in accordance with KRS

238.510

; and

Commonwealth detectives employed under KRS

69.110

and county detectives employed under KRS

69.360

.

The following officers shall be exempted from the certification requirements but may upon their request be certified by the council:

Sheriffs;

Coroners;

Constables;

Jailers;

Kentucky Horse Racing Commission security officers employed under KRS

230.240

; and

Commissioner of the State Police.

Federal peace officers cannot be certified under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

.

Local alcoholic beverage control investigators appointed under KRS Chapter 241 on or after April 1, 2019, shall be certified by the council if all minimum standards set forth in KRS

15.380

to

15.404

have been met. Local alcoholic beverage control investigators appointed under KRS Chapter 241 before April 1, 2019, shall be exempt from this requirement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 99, effective December 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 447, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 480, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 172, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 191, § 53, effective April 22, 2004; 2007, ch. 54, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 76, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 20, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 16, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 22, § 10, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 114, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 128, § 3, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 5, § 8, effective March 11, 2019; 2019 ch. 97, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 149, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). This statute was amended by 2019 Ky. Acts chs. 5, 97, and 149, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/26/2007). The amendment to this section in
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 4, effective June 26, 2007, is retroactive to July 1, 2004. See
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 5.

(6/26/2007). This section was amended by 2007 Ky. Acts chs. 54, 76, and 85. There is no conflict with Acts ch. 85. Where Acts chs. 54 and 76 are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 76, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

15.382.
Minimum qualifications for certification.

A person certified after December 1, 1998, under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

or qualified under the requirements set forth in KRS 15.440(1)(d)6. shall, at the time of becoming certified, meet the following minimum qualifications:

Be a citizen of the United States;

Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Be a high school graduate, regardless of whether the school is accredited or certified by a governing body, provided that the education received met the attendance and curriculum standards of Kentucky law at the time of graduation, as determined by the Kentucky Department of Education; or

Possess a High School Equivalency Diploma;

Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;

Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;

Not have been convicted of any felony; a misdemeanor under KRS

510.120

,

510.130

, or

510.140

; a second or subsequent offense under KRS

510.148

; or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct;

Not be prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;

Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics as established by the council;

Have not received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than honorable conditions, if having served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;

Have passed a medical examination as defined by the council by administrative regulation and provided by a licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse to determine if he can perform peace officer duties as determined by a validated job task analysis. However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the person shall pass the medical examination, appropriate to the agency’s job task analysis, of the employing agency. All agencies shall certify passing medical examination results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS

15.310

to

15.510

;

Have passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of an illegal controlled substance or prescription drug abuse. Any agency that administers its own test that meets or exceeds this standard shall certify passing test results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS

15.310

to

15.510

;

Have undergone a background investigation established or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine suitability for the position of a peace officer. If the employing agency has established its own background investigation that meets or exceeds the standards of the council, as set forth by administrative regulation, the agency shall conduct the background investigation and shall certify background investigation results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS

15.310

to

15.510

;

Have been interviewed by the employing agency;

Not have had certification as a peace officer permanently revoked in another state;

Have taken a psychological suitability screening administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine the person’s suitability to perform peace officer duties as determined by a council validated job task analysis. However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the person shall take that agency’s psychological examination, appropriate to the agency’s job task analysis. All agencies shall certify psychological examination results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS

15.310

to

15.510

;

Have passed a physical agility test administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine his suitability to perform peace officer duties as determined by a council validated job task analysis. However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the person shall take the physical agility examination of the employing agency. All agencies shall certify physical agility examination results to the council, which shall accept them as demonstrating compliance with KRS

15.310

to

15.510

; and

Have taken a polygraph examination administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine his suitability to perform peace officer duties. Any agency that administers its own polygraph examination as approved by the council shall certify the results that indicate whether a person is suitable for employment as a peace officer to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS

15.310

to

15.510

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 100, effective December 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 139, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 5, § 1, effective March 18, 2016; 2016 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 128, § 12, effective January 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 73, § 6, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 232, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

15.383.
Marksmanship qualification for certified peace officers.

In order to maintain his or her certification as a peace officer, each certified peace officer shall annually meet the marksmanship qualification requirement for a retired peace officer as specified in KRS

237.140

. Each law enforcement agency or other employing agency whose officers are required to meet the requirements of this subsection shall retain a record of each of its officers having met the annual marksmanship qualification. These records shall be made available upon request to the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in order to carry out its responsibilities under KRS

15.330

and

15.450

.

Any law enforcement or other agency employing a certified peace officer may require the certified peace officer to meet a marksmanship qualification requirement which is in excess of that specified in KRS

237.140

. Failure of a certified peace officer to meet the increased marksmanship qualification requirement specified by his or her employing or appointing agency shall not affect the certification of the officer, but may subject the officer to discipline by the agency, including suspension or dismissal of the officer from the agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 182, § 14, effective March 31, 2005; 2006, ch. 240, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2018 ch. 128, § 4, effective January 1, 2019.

15.384.
Cost of council administered tests — Waiver.

The council shall administer the physical agility, polygraph, psychological, and drug screen tests at cost for those agencies requesting council-administered tests. Agencies may petition the council for waiver of the costs of these tests upon a showing of undue financial hardship.

An agency may, at its own expense, administer its own physical agility, polygraph, psychological, medical, and drug screen tests, as well as additional tests.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 101, effective December 1, 1998.

15.386.
Certification categories — Required courses — Status of certification.

The following certification categories shall exist:

“Precertification status” means that the officer is currently employed or appointed by an agency and meets or exceeds all those minimum qualifications set forth in KRS

15.382

, but has not successfully completed a basic training course, except those peace officers covered by KRS

15.400

. Upon the council’s verification that the minimum qualifications have been met, the officer shall have full peace officer powers as authorized under the statute under which he or she was appointed or employed. If an officer fails to successfully complete a basic training course within one (1) year of employment, his or her enforcement powers shall automatically terminate, unless that officer is actively enrolled and participating in a basic training course or, after having begun a basic training course, is on an approved extension of time due to injury or extenuating circumstances;

“Certification status” means that unless the certification is in revoked status or inactive status, the officer is currently employed or appointed by an agency and has met all training requirements. The officer shall have full peace officer powers as authorized under the statute under which he or she was appointed or employed;

“Inactive status” means that unless the certification is in revoked status:

The person has been separated on or after December 1, 1998, from the agency by which he or she was employed or appointed and has no peace officer powers; or

The person is on military active duty for a period exceeding three hundred sixty-five (365) days.

The person may remain on inactive status. A person who is on inactive status and who returns to a peace officer position shall have certification status restored if he or she meets the requirements of KRS 15.400(1) or (2) or has successfully completed a basic training course approved and recognized by the council, has not committed an act for which his or her certified status may be revoked pursuant to KRS

15.391

and successfully completes in-service training as prescribed by the council, as follows:

If the person has been on inactive status for a period of less than three (3) years, and the person was not in training deficiency status at the time of separation, he or she shall complete:

The twenty-four (24) hour legal update Penal Code course;

The sixteen (16) hour legal update constitutional procedure course; and

The mandatory training course approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, pursuant to KRS

15.334

, for the year in which he or she returns to certification status; or

If the person has been on inactive status for a period of three (3) years or more, or the person was in training deficiency status at the time of separation, he or she shall complete:

The twenty-four (24) hour legal update Penal Code course;

The sixteen (16) hour legal update constitutional procedure course;

The mandatory training course approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, pursuant to KRS

15.334

, for the year in which he or she returns to certification status; and

One (1) of the following forty (40) hour courses which is most appropriate for the officer’s duty assignment:

Basic officer skills;

Orientation for new police chiefs; or

Mandatory duties of the sheriff.

A person returning from inactive to active certification after June 26, 2007, under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

, shall meet the following minimum qualifications:

Be a citizen of the United States;

Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;

Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;

Not have been convicted of any felony; a misdemeanor under KRS

510.120

,

510.130

, or

510.140

; a second or subsequent offense under KRS

510.148

; or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct;

Not be prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;

Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics as established by the council;

Have not received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than honorable conditions, if having served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;

Have been interviewed by the employing agency; and

Not have had certification as a peace officer permanently revoked in another state;

“Training deficiency status” means that unless the certification is in revoked status or inactive status, the officer is currently employed or appointed by an agency and has failed to meet all in-service training requirements. The officer’s enforcement powers shall automatically terminate, and he or she shall not exercise peace officer powers in the Commonwealth until he or she has corrected the in-service training deficiency;

“Revoked status” means that the officer has no enforcement powers and his or her certification has been revoked by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council under KRS

15.391

; and

“Denied status” means that a person does not meet the requirements to achieve precertification status or certification status.

The design of a certificate may be changed periodically. When a new certificate is produced, it shall be distributed free of charge to each currently certified peace officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 102, effective December 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 76, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 139, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2019 ch. 55, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 73, § 7, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 232, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the internal numbering of this statute to correct a manifest clerical or typographical error.

(6/26/2007). The amendment to this section in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 2, effective June 26, 2007, is retroactive to July 1, 2004. See 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 5.

15.388.
Report on certification status for newly employed peace officer or court security officer — Training of person in precertification status — Issuance or denial — Right of appeal — Transfer.

Within five (5) working days of employment or appointment, the chief executive officer of the employing agency, or his designee, shall file a report with the council certifying that the newly employed officer is certified or meets or exceeds the precertification qualifications of KRS

15.382

for peace officers or KRS

15.3971

for court security officers.

If the person is certified, the council shall continue certified status.

If the person is on inactive status, the council shall upgrade to certified status unless the certification is revoked or denied as provided by KRS

15.380

to

15.404

.

If the person is not certified and not on inactive status, but has successfully completed an applicable basic training course or received a basic training credit under KRS 15.440(1)(d)6. approved and recognized by the council, the council shall designate the person as being in certified status unless the certification is revoked or denied as provided by KRS

15.380

to

15.404

.

If the person is not certified and not on inactive status, and has not successfully completed an applicable basic training course approved and recognized by the council, the council shall designate the person as being in precertification status.

A person who is in precertification status shall, upon successful completion of the required basic training, be certified unless he has committed an act that would result in revocation of his certificate in which case he shall be denied certification.

A person who is denied certified status under this section shall have the same right of appeal as a person who has been revoked under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

.

If the certified peace officer has successfully completed the basic training required by KRS

15.404

and transfers from a peace officer or court security officer position from a current employer to a peace officer position for another employer, and both employers have, at least ten (10) working days prior to the effective date of the transfer, notified the council in writing of the transfer, the council shall maintain the officer in certified status.

If the certified court security officer has successfully completed the basic training required by KRS

15.3975

and transfers from a court security officer position from a current employer to a court security officer position for another employer, and both employers have, at least ten (10) working days prior to the effective date of the transfer, notified the council in writing of the transfer, the council shall maintain the officer in certified status.

A certified court security officer who has met the requirements of KRS

15.3971

shall not transfer from a court security officer position to a peace officer position unless the certified court security officer meets all the requirements of a certified peace officer under KRS

15.382

and 15.404(1). If the certified court security officer has met the minimum qualifications of KRS

15.382

, successfully completed the basic training required for certified peace officers under KRS 15.404(1), and transfers from a court security officer position from a current employer to a peace officer position for another employer, and both employers have, at least ten (10) working days prior to the effective date of the transfer, notified the council in writing of the transfer, the council shall maintain the officer in certified status.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 103, effective December 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 54, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 73, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

15.390.
Appeal upon denial of precertification.

Any person who is aggrieved by a determination by the employing agency or by the council that he fails to meet the requirements for precertification status may:

If the determination was made by the employing agency, appeal the decision in the same manner as other employment appeals within the agency, if an appeals procedure has been established by the employing agency; or

If the determination was made by the council, appeal the decision to the local Circuit Court having jurisdiction over the employing agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 104, effective December 1, 1998.

15.391.
Revocation of peace officer certification — Appeal — Hearing — Mandatory reporting — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section:

“Agency” means any law enforcement agency, or other unit of government listed in KRS

15.380

, that employs a certified peace officer;

“Final order” has the same meaning as in KRS

13B.010

;

“General employment policy” means a rule, regulation, policy, or procedure commonly applicable to the general workforce or civilian employees that is not unique to law enforcement activities or the exercise of peace officer authority, regardless of whether the rule, regulation, policy, or procedure exists or appears in a manual or handbook that is solely applicable to a law enforcement department or agency within the unit of government employing the officer;

“Investigating agency” means an agency that investigates the use of force by peace officers, including but not limited to the employing agency;

“Professional malfeasance” means engaging in an act in one’s professional capacity as a peace officer that violates a federal, state, or local law or regulation, or any act that involves the following:

The unjustified use of excessive or deadly force, as determined by an investigating agency;

Any intentional action by a peace officer that interferes with or alters the fair administration of justice, including but not limited to tampering with evidence, giving of false testimony, or the intentional disclosure of confidential information in a manner that compromises the integrity of an official investigation; or

Engaging in a sexual relationship with an individual the peace officer knows or should have known is a victim, witness, defendant, or informant in an ongoing criminal investigation in which the peace officer is directly involved;

“Professional nonfeasance” means a failure to perform one’s professional duty as a peace officer through omission or inaction that violates a federal, state, or local law or regulation, or any failure to act that involves the following:

The failure to intervene when it is safe and practical to do so in any circumstance where it is clear and apparent to the peace officer that another peace officer is engaging in the use of unlawful and unjustified excessive or deadly force; or

The intentional failure to disclose exculpatory or impeachment evidence that the peace officer knew or should have known to be materially favorable to an accused for the purpose of altering the fair administration of justice; and

“Regulation” means:

A federal or state administrative regulation adopted by a federal or state executive branch; and

A local rule, regulation, policy, or procedure adopted by ordinance, order, or resolution, or other official action by an agency. However, “regulation” does not mean a general employment policy.

The certification of a peace officer shall be deemed automatically revoked by the council by operation of the law for one (1) or more of the following:

Certification that was the result of an administrative error;

Plea of guilty to, conviction of, or entering of an Alford plea to:

Any state or federal felony;

A misdemeanor under KRS

510.120

,

510.130

, or

510.140

; a second or subsequent offense under KRS

510.148

; or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct;

Any criminal offense committed in another state that would constitute a felony if committed in this state; or

Any criminal offense committed in another state that would, if committed in this state, constitute a misdemeanor under KRS

510.120

,

510.130

, or

510.140

; a second or subsequent offense under KRS

510.148

; or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct;

Prohibition by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;

Receipt of a dishonorable discharge or bad conduct discharge from any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States; or

Willful falsification of information to obtain or maintain certification.

A peace officer whose certification is revoked pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may file an appeal at any time with the council. If an appeal is filed, the council shall conduct an administrative hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B to consider the reinstatement of the peace officer’s certification if the revocation was made in error or the condition requiring revocation was removed or remedied.

The council may impose any reasonable condition upon the reinstatement of the certification it may deem warranted under the facts of the appeal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the council may subpoena or request a court to subpoena records that are necessary to provide evidence that will permit the council to evaluate whether the cause for revocation has been remedied or removed. Any confidential or medical information received by the council under this subparagraph shall retain its confidential character.

The reversal or any other type of invalidation of a conviction by an appellate court shall constitute the removal or remedy of a condition requiring revocation. However, an expungement of a felony offense shall not be considered a removal or remedy that constitutes grounds for the reinstatement of the peace officer’s certification under this paragraph.

A final order issued by the council denying reinstatement of certification may be appealed pursuant to the provisions of KRS

13B.140

.

The certification of a peace officer may be revoked by the council for one (1) or more of the following:

Termination of the peace officer for failure to meet or maintain training requirements, unless the certification is in inactive status. As used in this subparagraph, “inactive status” has the same meaning as in KRS

15.386

;

Termination of the peace officer for professional malfeasance or professional nonfeasance by his or her agency;

Termination of the peace officer following the plea of guilty to, conviction of, or entering of an Alford plea to any misdemeanor offense, in this state or out of it, that involves:

Dishonesty;

Fraud;

Deceit;

Misrepresentation;

Physical violence;

Sexual abuse; or

Crimes against a minor or a family or household member;

Receipt of general discharge under other than honorable conditions from any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States that results in the termination of the peace officer from his or her agency; or

Resignation or retirement of the peace officer while he or she is under criminal investigation or administrative investigation for professional malfeasance or professional nonfeasance that, in the judgment of the agency that employed the peace officer, would have likely resulted in the termination of that peace officer had the facts leading to the investigation been substantiated prior to his or her resignation or retirement.

The council shall review reports of events described in paragraph (a) of this subsection to determine whether the event warrants the initiation of proceedings by the council to revoke a peace officer’s certification. If the council determines to initiate proceedings to revoke a peace officer’s certification under this subsection, the administrative hearing shall be conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B. A final order by the council revoking certification may be appealed pursuant to the provisions of KRS

13B.140

.

An agency:

That has knowledge of a peace officer in its employment who meets any of the revocation conditions outlined in subsection (2) of this section shall report that condition to the council within fifteen (15) days of gaining knowledge;

That terminated a peace officer for any of the revocation conditions outlined in subsection (3)(a)1., 2., 3., or 4. of this section shall report that condition to the council within fifteen (15) days of the termination; and

That would have likely terminated a peace officer for the revocation condition outlined in subsection (3)(a)5. of this section shall report that condition to the council within fifteen (15) days of the peace officer’s resignation or retirement. If an agency reports pursuant to this subparagraph, the agency shall notify the peace officer that a report has been made.

If an agency fails to make a report required by this subsection, the council may suspend the agency from participation in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund. However, the time that an agency may be suspended by the council under this paragraph shall not exceed five (5) years.

The council may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 139, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2019 ch. 95, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 73, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 232, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

15.392.
Report on separation from service — Placement of certification on inactive status — Lapse or retirement of certification — Action by council.

Within ten (10) working days from separation from service, the chief executive officer of the employing agency or his designee shall file with the council a summary report that provides the relevant information about the person’s separation from service.

If the person separated from service has successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized by the council or has received a basic training credit under KRS 15.440(1)(d)6., the council shall place the certification on inactive status. Placement of certification on inactive status shall not prevent the council from subsequently instituting an action to revoke an officer’s certification in appropriate cases in accordance with KRS

15.391

.

If the person has been separated from service or has not successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized by the council and fails to meet the requirements of KRS 15.400(1) or (2), the certification shall lapse.

If the person has been separated due to death, the certification shall be retired.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 105, effective December 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 132, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 76, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 139, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 73, §§ 2, 9, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 73, secs. 2 and 9, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/26/2007). The amendment to this section in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 3, effective June 26, 2007, is retroactive to July 1, 2004. See 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 76, sec. 5.

(6/26/2007). This section was amended by 2007 Ky. Acts chs. 76 and 139. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 139, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

15.394.
Declaratory judgment action if agency job task analysis deemed invalid.

If the council believes an agency’s job task analysis to be insufficient or erroneous, the council shall file a declaratory action in Franklin Circuit Court to declare the job task analysis invalid.

Until the job task analysis has been declared invalid and all appeals have been exhausted, the council shall accept the agency’s job task analysis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 106, effective December 1, 1998.

15.396.
Effect if agency knowingly employs or appoints persons who fail to meet requirements of KRS 15.380 to 15.404.

An agency may be required to pay for all training received by a person from the Department of Criminal Justice Training or any other facility approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council if the agency knowingly employs or appoints a person to be an officer of any type as enumerated in KRS

15.380

and if that person fails to achieve certified status as required by KRS

15.380

to

15.404

.

The agency shall be denied participation in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund if the agency knowingly employs or appoints a person to be an officer of any type as enumerated in KRS

15.380

and if that person:

Fails to meet those minimum qualifications set forth in KRS

15.402

;

Fails to achieve certified status as required by KRS

15.380

to

15.404

; or

Fails to maintain the minimum training requirements set forth in KRS

15.404

.

An agency that is in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be relieved of the associated penalty upon:

Termination of the officer who is the source of the violation; or

Correction of the officer’s deficiency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 107, effective December 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 132, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL.

An applicant for certification as a police officer who has a diploma from a private high school that is not certified by the Kentucky Department of Education may still be certified if that private high school complies with all applicable private secondary school provisions. An agency must either follow its precedents or provide a reasoned analysis for its departure from them. A police agency is liable under
KRS §

15.396

for employing a police officer whose certification is subsequently revoked only from the time that the police agency becomes aware that the officer’s certification has been revoked.

OAG 2015-06

.

15.3971.
Court security officers — Minimum qualifications — Exceptions.

A person certified as a court security officer after June 26, 2007, under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

shall, at the time of becoming certified, meet the following minimum qualifications:

Be a citizen of the United States;

Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Be a high school graduate, regardless of whether the school is accredited or certified by a governing body, provided that the education received met the attendance and curriculum standards of Kentucky law at the time of graduation, as determined by the Kentucky Department of Education; or

Possess a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma;

Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;

Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;

Not have been convicted of any felony;

Not be prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;

Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics, as established by the council;

Have not received a dishonorable discharge, a bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than honorable conditions if he or she served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;

Have passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of an illegal controlled substance or prescription drug abuse. Any agency that administers its own test that meets or exceeds this standard shall certify passing test results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS

15.380

to

15.404

;

Have undergone a background investigation established or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine suitability for the position of a court security officer. If the employing agency has established its own background investigation that meets or exceeds the standards of the council, as set forth by administrative regulation, the agency shall conduct the background investigation and shall certify background investigation results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.380 to 15.404;

Have been interviewed by the employing agency;

Have taken a psychological suitability screening administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine the person’s suitability to perform court security officer duties; and

Have taken a polygraph examination administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation to determine his or her suitability to perform court security officer duties. Any agency that administers its own polygraph examination as approved by the council shall certify the results that indicate whether a person is suitable for employment as a court security officer to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.380 to 15.404.

A court security officer employed on or before June 26, 2007, shall comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section within six (6) months of June 26, 2007.

A peace officer who has previously attended law enforcement basic training and met the certification requirements of KRS

15.380

and

15.382

shall not be required to meet the requirements of this section to be appointed a court security officer, but shall meet the requirements of KRS 15.386(3).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 54, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 5, § 2, effective March 18, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.